Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 6 Regulation of Maintenance and Use of Public Roads Generally

Cross references.

Access to and use of public facilities by physically handicapped persons, T. 30, C. 3.

Penalty for operating unlicensed or unregistered vehicles on public highways, §

40-2-8

.

Uniform rules of the road, T. 40, C. 6.

Procedure for passing stationary authorized emergency vehicles, stationary towing or recovery vehicles, or stationary highway maintenance vehicles, §

40-6-16

.